Maryland, session 2025, SB0503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
31–102.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0503*

SENATE BILL 503
This title applies only in Washington County.
31–201.
There is a Board of License Commissioners for Washington County.
31–202.
(a) (1) The Governor shall appoint three members to the Board.
(2) The appointments shall be made:
(i) if the Senate is in session, with the advice and consent of the
Senate; or
(ii) if the Senate is not in session, by the Governor alone.
(b) (1) Each member of the Board shall be:
(i) a resident and voter of the county; and
(ii) an individual of high character and integrity and of recognized
business capacity.
[(2) Not more than two members of the Board may belong to the same
political party.]
(2) (I) TWO MEMBERS OF THE BOARD SHALL BELONG TO THE
POLITICAL PARTY THAT RECEIVED THE HIGHEST AGGREGATED NUMBER OF VOTES
IN THE PRECEDING ELECTION OF THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS.
(II) ONE MEMBER OF THE BOARD SHALL BELONG TO THE
POLITICAL PARTY THAT RECEIVED THE SECOND HIGHEST AGGREGATED NUMBER OF
VOTES IN THE PRECEDING ELECTION OF THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS.
(c) A member of the Board may not have a pecuniary or other interest in any
phase of the manufacture, sale, or distribution of alcoholic beverages.
(d) (1) The term of a member is 6 years.
(2) The terms of the members are staggered as required by the terms
provided for members of the Board on July 1, 2016.

SENATE BILL 503 3
(e) (1) The Governor shall appoint an eligible individual to fill a vacancy
during the remainder of the term of office of the individual originally appointed in
accordance with subsection (a) of this section.
(2) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
remainder of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(f) (1) The Governor may remove a member for misconduct in office,
incompetence, or willful neglect of duty.
(2) The Governor shall give a member who is charged a copy of the charges
against the member and, with at least 10 days’ notice, an opportunity to be heard publicly
in person or by counsel.
(3) If a member is removed, the Governor shall file with the Office of the
Secretary of State a statement of charges against the member and the Governor’s findings
on the charges.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.